California, session 20252026, AB1259.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19288 of the Elections Code is amended to read:19288. Within 60 days after the completion of the examination of a remote accessible vote by mail system, the Secretary of State shall make publicly available available, including by publication on the Secretary of State’s internet website, a report stating whether the remote accessible vote by mail system has been certified or conditionally approved, or whether certification has been withheld.